Utah statutes.
63B-11-302.   Maximum amount -- Projects authorized.
(1)  The total amount of bonds issued under this part may not exceed
$159,000,000.
(2) (a)  Proceeds from the issuance of bonds shall be provided to the
Department of Transportation to provide funds to pay all or part of the costs
of state highway construction or reconstruction projects.
(b)  These costs may include the cost of acquiring land, interests in land,
easements and rights-of-way, improving sites, and making all improvements
necessary, incidental, or convenient to the facilities, interest estimated to
accrue on these bonds during the period to be covered by construction of the
projects plus a period of six months after the end of the construction period,
interest estimated to accrue on any bond anticipation notes issued under the
authority of Chapter 11, Part 4, 2002 Highway General Obligation Bond
Anticipation Notes Authorization, and all related engineering, architectural,
and legal fees.
(3)  The commission or the state treasurer may make any statement of intent
relating to a reimbursement that is necessary or desirable to comply with
federal tax law.
(4)  The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements related to
that project before the receipt of proceeds of bonds issued under this
chapter.
